Virginia statutes. Title 24.2. Elections.
Article 2.1. Reapportionment of Local Election Districts.

§ 24.2-304.1.
At-large and district elections; reapportionment and redistricting of districts or wards; limits.

Except as otherwise specifically limited by general law or special act, the governing body of each county, city, or town may provide by ordinance for the election of its members on any of the following bases: (i) at large from the county, city, or town; (ii) from single-member or multi-member districts or wards, or any combination thereof; or (iii) from any combination of at-large, single-member, and multi-member districts or wards. A change in the basis for electing the members of the governing body shall not constitute a change in the form of county government.

If the members are elected from districts or wards and other than entirely at large from the locality, the districts or wards shall be composed of contiguous and compact territory and shall be so constituted as to give, as nearly as is practicable, representation in proportion to the population of the district or ward. In 1971 and every 10 years thereafter, the governing body of each such locality shall reapportion the representation among the districts or wards, including, if the governing body deems it appropriate, increasing or diminishing the number of such districts or wards, in order to give, as nearly as is practicable, representation on the basis of population.

For the purposes of redistricting and reapportioning representation in 2021 and every 10 years thereafter, the governing body of a county, city, or town shall use the most recent decennial population figures for such county, city, or town from the United States Bureau of the Census, as adjusted by the Division of Legislative Services pursuant to §

24.2-314

. The census data for these redistricting and apportionment purposes will not include any population figure that is not allocated to specific census blocks within the Commonwealth, even though that population may have been included in the apportionment population figures of the Commonwealth for the purpose of allocating United States House of Representatives seats among the states.

Notwithstanding any other provision of general law or special act, the governing body of a county, city, or town shall not reapportion the representation in the governing body at any time other than that required following the decennial census, except as (i) provided by law upon a change in the boundaries of the county, city, or town that results in an increase or decrease in the population of the county, city, or town of more than one percent, (ii) the result of a court order, (iii) the result of a change in the form of government, or (iv) the result of an increase or decrease in the number of districts or wards other than at-large districts or wards. The foregoing provisions notwithstanding, the governing body subsequent to the decennial redistricting may adjust district or ward boundaries in order that the boundaries might coincide with state legislative or congressional district boundaries; however, no adjustment shall affect more than five percent of the population of a ward or district or 250 persons, whichever is lesser. If districts created by a reapportionment enacted subsequent to a decennial reapportionment are invalid under the provisions of this subsection, the immediately preexisting districts shall remain in force and effect until validly reapportioned in accordance with law.

History.

1995, c. 249; 2000, c. 884; 2001, Sp. Sess. I, c. 6; 2002, c. 127; 2012, c. 357; 2013, c. 483; 2020, cc. 1229, 1265.

Editor’s note.

This section was subject to preclearance by the Department of Justice, pursuant to § 5 of the federal Voting Rights Act. Preclearance has been received.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 884, in subsection C, substituted “2001” for “1971” and deleted “population figures” following “town shall use” and inserted “population figures for such county, city, or town from the” and substituted the language beginning “Bureau of the Census” and ending “seats among the states” for “census for such county, city, or town.”

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001, Special Session I, amendment by c. 6, effective November 1, 2001, pursuant to Va. Const., art. IV, § 13, added the second sentence in subsection C.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 127 substituted “twelve” for ‘’eighteen” in the last sentence of subsection C.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 357 substituted “containing one or more federal, state, and regional adult correctional facilities whose inmate population, as determined by the information provided by the facilities, on the date of the decennial census exceeded 12 percent of the ideal population of an election district of the county, city, or town” for “containing a state adult correctional facility whose inmate population, as determined by the information provided by the Department of Corrections, on the date of the decennial census exceeded twelve percent of the total population of such county, city, or town” in the second sentence of subsection C; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 483, rewrote subsection C; in subsection D, substituted “that results” for “which results” in clause (i) and “preexisting” for “pre-existing” in the last sentence.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1229 and 1265 are identical, and in subsection C, substituted “2021” for “2001,” and “as adjusted by the Division of Legislative Services pursuant to §

24.2-314

” for “which figures are identical to those from the actual enumeration conducted by the United States Bureau of the Census for the apportionment of representatives in the United States House of Representatives, except that” in the first sentence, and deleted the former last two sentences, which read: “The governing body of any county, city, or town may elect to exclude the adult inmate population of any federal, state, or regional adult correctional facility located in the locality from the population figures used for the purposes of the decennial reapportionment and redistricting. The adult inmate population so excluded shall be based on information provided by the facility as to the adult inmate population at the facility on the date of the decennial census.”

Law Review.

For an article, “Redistricting in the Post-2000 Era,” see 8 Geo. Mason L. Rev. 431 (2000).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

County redistricting. —

Article VII, § 5 of the Virginia Constitution and §

24.2-304.1

mandate that the County Board of Supervisors take affirmative action to reapportion the magisterial districts for the county in the tenth year since the last reapportionment using the most recent decennial population figures. See opinion of Attorney General to Karen T. Mullins, Esquire, County Attorney, Wise County, 11-075, 2011 Va. AG LEXIS 36 (6/22/11).

Inclusion of out-of-state prisoners in census figures. —

The General Assembly has not authorized local governing bodies to exclude out-of-state prisoners housed in a state adult correctional facility from the locality’s population for the purposes of the decennial reapportionment if the total population of inmates housed at the facility does not exceed twelve percent of the locality’s population. See opinion of Attorney General to J. Vaden Hunt, Esquire, County Attorney, Pittsylvania County, 11-011, 2011 Va. AG LEXIS 15 (3/1/11).

§ 24.2-304.2.
Governing body authorized to expend funds for reapportionment.

The governing body of each county, city, or town is authorized to expend funds and employ persons as it may deem necessary to carry out the responsibilities relating to reapportionment provided by law.

History.

1995, c. 249.

§ 24.2-304.3.
Recording reapportionment ordinance; notice requirements.

A copy of the ordinance reapportioning representation in the governing body of a county, city, or town, including a description of the boundaries and a map showing the boundaries of the districts or wards, shall be recorded in the official minutes of the governing body.

The clerk of the county, city, or town shall send a certified copy of the ordinance, including a description of the boundaries and a Geographic Information System (GIS) map showing the boundaries of the districts or wards, to the local electoral board, the Secretary of the Commonwealth, the Department of Elections, and the Division of Legislative Services. Any county, city, or town that does not have GIS capabilities may request the Department of Elections to create on its behalf a GIS map showing the boundaries of the districts or wards as set out in the ordinance, and the Department of Elections shall create such a map.

History.

1995, c. 249; 2019, cc. 777, 778.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendments by cc. 777 and 778 are identical, and in the second paragraph, inserted “Geographic Information System (GIS),” substituted “the Department” for “State Board,” added the second sentence; and made stylistic changes.

§ 24.2-304.4.
Mandamus action for failure to reapportion districts or wards.

Whenever the governing body of any county, city or town fails to perform the duty of reapportioning the representation on the governing body among the districts or wards of the county, city, or town, or fails to change the boundaries of districts or wards, as prescribed by law, mandamus shall lie in favor of any citizen of such county, city, or town, to compel the performance of such duty.

Whenever the governing body of any county, city or town changes the boundaries, or increases or diminishes the number of districts or wards, or reapportions the representation in the governing body as prescribed by law, the action shall not be subject to judicial review, unless it is alleged that the representation is not proportional to the population of the district or ward. If such allegation is made in a bill of complaint filed in the circuit court for the county, city or town, the court shall determine whether the action of the governing body complies with the constitutional requirements for redistricting and reapportionment. Appeals from the court’s decision shall be as in any other suit.

History.

1995, c. 249.

Research References.

Friend’s Virginia Pleading and Practice (Matthew Bender). Chapter 33 Writs and Injunctions. § 33.01 Writs. Friend.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Declaratory judgment. —

Town and its officials did not allege in their motion for declaratory judgment that representation of certain districts was not proportional to the population, and thus, they could not proceed under the statute. Town of White Stone v. Cty. of Lancaster, 97 Va. Cir. 309, 2002 Va. Cir. LEXIS 480 (Lancaster County Oct. 10, 2002).

Construction. —

This section, which specifically deals with mandamus actions relating to reapportionment of local election districts should prevail over §

17.1-513

, which confers general jurisdiction inclusive of the general right to issue writs of mandamus; this section is controlling on mandamus actions pertaining to reapportionment of election districts by local government because it specifically deals with the subject and is the latest expression of the General Assembly. Town of White Stone v. Cty. of Lancaster, 97 Va. Cir. 309, 2002 Va. Cir. LEXIS 480 (Lancaster County Oct. 10, 2002).

This section, which specifically deals with mandamus actions relating to reapportionment of local election districts should prevail over §

17.1-513

, which confers general jurisdiction inclusive of the general right to issue writs of mandamus; this section is controlling on mandamus actions pertaining to reapportionment of election districts by local government because it specifically deals with the subject and is the latest expression of the General Assembly. Town of White Stone v. Cty. of Lancaster, 97 Va. Cir. 309, 2002 Va. Cir. LEXIS 480 (Lancaster County Oct. 10, 2002).

“Action” referred to is construed to mean a mandamus and solely a mandamus action. Town of White Stone v. Cty. of Lancaster, 97 Va. Cir. 309, 2002 Va. Cir. LEXIS 480 (Lancaster County Oct. 10, 2002).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

County redistricting. —

Article VII, § 5 of the Virginia Constitution and §

24.2-304.1

mandate that the County Board of Supervisors take affirmative action to reapportion the magisterial districts for the county in the tenth year since the last reapportionment using the most recent decennial population figures. See opinion of Attorney General to Karen T. Mullins, Esquire, County Attorney, Wise County, 11-075, 2011 Va. AG LEXIS 36 (6/22/11).

§ 24.2-304.5.
Notification of certain civil actions.

Any county, city, or town made a defendant in any civil action challenging the legality of its election district boundaries shall immediately notify the Attorney General of the pending civil action for review pursuant to §

2.2-508

.

History.

1995, c. 249.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

County redistricting. —

Article VII, § 5 of the Virginia Constitution and §

24.2-304.1

mandate that the County Board of Supervisors take affirmative action to reapportion the magisterial districts for the county in the tenth year since the last reapportionment using the most recent decennial population figures. See opinion of Attorney General to Karen T. Mullins, Esquire, County Attorney, Wise County, 11-075, 2011 Va. AG LEXIS 36 (6/22/11).

§ 24.2-304.6.
Effect of reapportionment on appointments and terms of local officers, school board and planning commission members.

County, city, or town officers, including members of the school board or planning commission, in office on the effective date of a reapportionment or redistricting ordinance, shall complete their terms of office, regardless of loss of residency in a particular district due to reapportionment or redistricting.

History.

1995, c. 249.